Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 339.370 is amended to read:
339.370. As used in ORS 339.370 to 339.400:
(1) “Abuse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(2) “Agent” means a person acting as an agent for an education provider in a manner  that re-
quires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
(3) “Commission licensee” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(4) “Contractor” means a person providing services to an education  provider under a contract
in a manner that requires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
(5)(a) “Education provider” means:
(A) A school district, as defined in ORS 332.002.
(B) The Oregon School for the Deaf.
(C) An educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program.
(D) A public charter school, as defined in ORS 338.005.
(E) An education service district, as defined in ORS 334.003.
(F) An approved recovery school, as defined in ORS 336.680.
(G) Any state-operated program that provides educational services to students.
(H) A private school.
(b) “Education provider” does not include:
(A) The Oregon Youth Authority;
(B) The Department of Corrections; or
(C) The  Department of Education, except when functioning as an education provider on behalf
of the Oregon School for the Deaf.
(6) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry  into the factual allegations of a report of suspected
abuse or suspected sexual conduct that:
Enrolled House Bill 4160 (HB 4160-INTRO) Page 1
(a) Is based on interviews with the person who initiated the  report, the person who may have
been subjected to abuse or sexual conduct, witnesses  and the person who is the subject of the re-
port; and
(b) Results in a finding that the report:
(A) Is a substantiated report;
(B) Cannot be substantiated; or
(C) Is not a report of abuse or sexual conduct.
(7) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 419B.005.
(8) “Licensed administrator” means a person who  is employed as an administrator of an educa-
tion provider and who:
(a) Holds an administrative  license issued by the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission
under ORS 342.125 (3)(f) or (g); or
(b) Does not hold an administrative  license issued by the commission because the person is
employed by an education provider that does not require administrators  to be licensed by the com-
mission.
(9) “Private  school” means a school that provides to students instructional programs that are
not limited solely to dancing, drama, music, religious or athletic instruction.
(10) “School board” means the entity charged with adopting policies for an education provider.
(11) “School employee” means an employee of an education provider.
(12)(a) “Sexual conduct” means verbal or physical conduct or verbal,  written or electronic
communications by a school employee, a contractor, an agent or a volunteer that involve a  student
and that are:
(A) Sexual advances or requests for sexual favors directed toward the student; or
(B) Of a sexual nature  that are directed toward the student or that have the effect of unrea-
sonably interfering with the student’s educational  performance, or of creating an intimidating or
hostile educational environment.
(b) “Sexual conduct” does not include:
(A) Touching or other physical contact:
(i) That is necessitated by the  nature of the school employee’s job duties or by the services re-
quired to be provided by the contractor, agent or volunteer; and
(ii) For which there is no sexual intent.
(B) Verbal, written or  electronic communications that are provided as part of an education
program that meets state educational standards or a policy approved by the school board.
(C) Conduct or communications described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection if the school em-
ployee, contractor, agent or volunteer is also a student and the conduct or communications:
(i) Arise out of a consensual relationship between students;
(ii) Do not create an intimidating or hostile educational environment; and
(iii) Are not prohibited by law,  any policies of the education provider or any applicable em-
ployment agreements.
(13) “Student” means any person:
(a) Who is:
(A) In any grade from prekindergarten through grade 12; or
(B) Twenty-one years of age or younger  and receiving educational or related services from an
education provider that is not a post-secondary institution of education; or
(b) Who was previously known as a student by the person engaging in sexual  conduct and who
left school or graduated from high school within [ 90 days ] one calendar year  prior to the sexual
conduct.
(14) “Substantiated report” means a report of abuse or sexual conduct that  a law enforcement
agency, the Department of Human Services,  the Teacher Standards and Practices Commission, the
Department of Education or an education provider  has reasonable cause to believe, based on the
available evidence after conducting an investigation, is founded.
Enrolled House Bill 4160 (HB 4160-INTRO) Page 2
(15) “Volunteer” means a person acting as a volunteer for  an education provider in a manner
that requires the person to have direct, unsupervised contact with students.
SECTION 2. The amendments to ORS 339.370 by section 1 of this 2024  Act apply to con-
duct occurring on or after the effective date of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 3. This 2024 Act takes effect on July 1, 2024.
Passed by House February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 5, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4160 (HB 4160-INTRO) Page 3